src/fst/morphology/affixes/adverbs.lexc
!! # Adverb inflection
!! ----
!! Komi adverbs inflect for direction.


LEXICON ADV_DEG_ 
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@  depricate ADV_ADA_ and Ad-ATAG
+Deg: WordEnd ;

LEXICON ADV_MANNER_
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Manner: K ;

LEXICON ADV_NEG_
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Neg: WordEnd ;

LEXICON GER_
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+V+Ger: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_GER_IGON ! these are checked as gerunds in +Der/Ig
+V+Der+Der/Ig+Ins: ADV_ ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON ADV_IS_GER_IGTYRJI ! these are checked as gerunds in +Der/Ig
!2018-10-21!+V+Der+Der/Ig+Der+Der/tyrji: ADV_ ;

!LEXICON ADV_IS_GER_MON ! these are checked as gerunds in +Der/mwn
!+V+Der+Der/mwn: ADV_ ;

!LEXICON ADV_IS_GER_OMON ! these are checked as gerunds in +Der/wmwn
!+V+Der+Der/wmwn: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_GER_TOG ! these are checked as gerunds in +Der/twg
+V+VCar: K ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_GER_TODZ ! these are checked as gerunds in +Der/twdz
+V+VTer: K ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_N_TOG ! these are checked as state adverbials in +Der/twg
+N+Sg+Car: K ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_ADV_TOG ! polar adverbials in +Der/twg
+Der+Der/twg: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_Q_TOG ! polar adverbials in +Der/twg
+Qnt+Der+Der/twg: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV_SUPERL_
+Superl:               K ;
!LEXICON ADV_SUPERL_ELA
!+Superl+Ela:    K/COP_PL ;
LEXICON ADV_SUPERL_INE
+Superl+Ine:    K/COP_PL ;

!LEXICON ADV_IS_SUPERL !
!+Der+Der/med: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV_F !
+Src/F: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV_STATE !
+Sem/State: COMPARATIVE ; !

LEXICON ADV_PARENTHETIC_O2
:%>ӧ ADV_PARENTHETIC_ ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth:%>э ADV_PARENTHETIC_ ;

LEXICON ADV_PARENTHETIC_
+Parenthetic: WordEnd ;

LEXICON ADV_SUB
+Use/NG+Err/Orth: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV_O2
:%>ӧ ADV_ ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth:%>э ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV_ ! these are checked as advs.
: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_L ! these are checked as advs.
:^Close COMPARATIVE ;
+Err/Orth-l-to-vowel-lengthening:^C2V COMPARATIVE ;
+Err/Orth-l-retenstion: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_INE_
+Ine: K ;
LEXICON ADV_IS_INE_AND_COP_PL_
+Ine: K ;
+Ine: COP_PL ;

LEXICON ADV_INDEF_
+Indef: WordEnd ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON ADV_INDEF_HAS_SJURO
!2018-10-21!+Indef+Der/sjurw: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON ADV_INDEF_HAS_KO
!2018-10-21!+Indef+Der/kw: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON ADV_4_INTERR_REL_INDEF
!2018-10-21!+Interr: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Rel: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Indef: 4_INDEF_TYPES_KO_SJURO ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON ADV_EGR_4_INTERR_REL_INDEF !! кысянь
!2018-10-21!+Interr+Egr: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Rel+Egr: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Indef+Egr: 4_INDEF_TYPES_KO_SJURO ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON ADV_EGR_ILL_4_INTERR_REL_INDEF !! кытчаньӧ
!2018-10-21!+Interr+Egr+Ill: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Rel+Egr+Ill: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Indef+Egr+Ill: 4_INDEF_TYPES_KO_SJURO ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON ADV_ELA_4_INTERR_REL_INDEF !! кытысь
!2018-10-21!+Interr+Ela: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!!2018-10-21!+Rel+Ela: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Indef+Ela: 4_INDEF_TYPES_KO_SJURO ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON ADV_ILL_4_INTERR_REL_INDEF !! кытчӧ
!2018-10-21!+Interr+Ill: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Rel+Ill: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Indef+Ill: 4_INDEF_TYPES_KO_SJURO ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON ADV_TRA_4_INTERR_REL_INDEF !! кыті
!2018-10-21!+Interr+Tra: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Rel+Tra: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Indef+Tra: 4_INDEF_TYPES_KO_SJURO ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON ADV_TRA_EGR_4_INTERR_REL_INDEF ! This might require something for double case
!2018-10-21!+Interr+Tra+Egr: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Rel+Tra+Egr: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Indef+Tra+Egr: 4_INDEF_TYPES_KO_SJURO ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON ADV_TER_4_INTERR_REL_INDEF !! кытчӧдз
!2018-10-21!+Interr+Ter: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Rel+Ter: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Indef+Ter: 4_INDEF_TYPES_KO_SJURO ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON 4_INDEF_TYPES_KO_SJURO
!2018-10-21!+Der/kw:кӧ WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Der/sjurw:сюрӧ WordEnd ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON ADV_INTERR_
!2018-10-21!+Interr: WordEnd ;


LEXICON ADV_REL_TEMP_
+Rel+Sem/Time: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON AdvTemp
 ADV_TEMP_ ;

LEXICON ADV_TEMP_
+Sem/Time: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_MULT_
+Mult: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_ITER_
+Iter: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON CARD_ITER_APPR
!кыкысь-куимысь
+Card+Iter+Appr: K ;

LEXICON ORD_ITER_APPR
!мӧдысь-коймӧдысь
+Ord+Iter+Appr: K ;


LEXICON ADV_SPAT  !!= * **@CODE@**
      !! these are adverbs in spatial cases
      !! and they probably are equivalent in morphology to postpositions
 ADV_SPAT_APR ;
 ADV_SPAT_APRILL ;
 ADV_SPAT_APRINE ;
 ADV_SPAT_APRELA ;
 ADV_SPAT_EGR ;
 ADV_SPAT_ELA ;
 ADV_SPAT_ILL ;
 ADV_SPAT_INE ;
 ADV_SPAT_PRL ;
 ADV_SPAT_TER ;
 ADV_SPAT_TRA ;

LEXICON ADV_SPAT_LA ! These adverbs have a formative in ла
+Der/la: ADV_SPAT ;

LEXICON ADV_SPAT_APR
+Spat+Apr:%>лань SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_SPAT_APRELA
+Spat+Apr:%>ланьысь SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_SPAT_APRILL
+Spat+Apr:%>ланьӧ SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_SPAT_APRINE
+Spat+Apr:%>ланьын SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_SPAT_EGR
+Spat+Egr:%>сянь SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_SPAT_ELA
+Spat+Ela:%>ысь SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_SPAT_ILL
+Spat+Ill:%>ӧ SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_SPAT_INE
+Spat+Ine:%>ын SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_SPAT_PRL
+Spat+Prl:%>ӧд K ;

LEXICON ADV_SPAT_TRA
+Spat+Tra:%>ті COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_SPAT_TER
+Spat+Ter:%>ӧдз COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_VTER
+VTer:%>тӧдз K ;

! Adverbs with ready morphology
LEXICON ADV_IS_APRELA
+Apr+Ela: SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_APRILL
+Apr+Ill: SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_APRINE
+Apr+Ine: SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_APR
+Apr: SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_EGR
+Egr: SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_ELA
+Ela: SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_ILL
+Ill: IllCompar ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_INE
+Ine: SPAT_COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_INS
+Ins: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_PRL
+Prl: K ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_TER
+Ter: K ;
+Ter+Der/kodj:%>кодь K ; ! Is this an ordering issue 2019-06-03
+Ter+Comp:%>джык K ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_TRA
+Tra: COMPARATIVE ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
