src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON adverbs
аски-мӧдлун+Adv:аски-мӧдлун ADV_TEMP_  "" ;
аскомысь+Adv:аскомысь ADV_TEMP_  "ylihuomenna" ;
бордйыв+Adv:бордйы^л2 ADV_L  "siivillä" ;
бӧръявыв+Adv:бӧръявы^л2 ADV_L  "lopulta" ;
бӧрланьӧ+Adv:бӧрланьӧ ADV_IS_APRILL  "" ;
бӧрланьысь+Adv:бӧрланьысь ADV_IS_APRELA  "" ;
бӧрланьын+Adv:бӧрланьын ADV_IS_APRINE  "" ;
бӧрӧд+Adv:бӧрӧд ADV_IS_PRL  "" ;
вель+Adv:вель ADV_DEG_  "melko" ;
вемӧсӧн+Adv:вемӧсӧн ADV_STATE  "" ;
вернӧ+Adv:вернӧ ADV_PARENTHETIC_  "" ;
вернӧя+Adv:вернӧя ADV_PARENTHETIC_  "" ;
веськыдладорті+Adv:веськыдладорті ADV_IS_TRA  "" ;
веськыдладорын+Adv:веськыдладорын ADV_IS_INE  "" ;
видзчысьӧмпырысь+Adv:видзчысьӧмпырысь ADV_  "" ;
воддзаысь+Adv:воддзаысь ADV_ITER_  "" ;
воддзаӧн+Adv:воддзаӧн ADV_IS_INS  "" ;
водзвылӧ+Adv:водзвылӧ ADV_IS_ILL  "" ;
водзвылысь+Adv:водзвылысь ADV_IS_ELA  "" ;
водзвывлань+Adv:водзвывлань ADV_IS_APR  "" ;
водзвылӧдз+Adv:водзвылӧдз ADV_IS_TER  "" ;
водзладорсянь+Adv:водзладорсянь ADV_IS_EGR  "" ;
водзланьын+Adv:водзланьын ADV_IS_APRINE  "" ;
водзланьысь+Adv:водзланьысь ADV_IS_APRELA  "" ;
водзланьӧ+Adv:водзланьӧ ADV_IS_APRILL  "" ;
выльвылысь+Adv:выльвылысь ADV_IS_ELA  "" ;
выльлаті+Adv:выльлаті ADV_IS_TRA  "" ;
гоз-мӧдысь+Adv:гоз-мӧдысь ADV_ITER_  "" ;
горув+Adv:гору^л2 ADV_L  "" ;
гӧгӧрын+Adv:гӧгӧрын ADV_IS_INE  "" ;
гӧрбыльӧн+Adv:гӧрбыльӧн ADV_IS_INS  "" ;
джынйӧдз+Adv:джынйӧдз ADV_IS_TER  "" ;
дзирс+Adv:дзирс ADV_  "" ;
дзув+Adv:дзу^л2 ADV_L  "läpi" ;
дзурс+Adv:дзурс ADV_DEG_  "aivan" ;
жаляддзатӧг+Adv:жаляддзатӧг ADV_IS_ADV_TOG  "" ;
здукӧн+Adv:здукӧн ADV_IS_INS  "" ;
ичӧтвывсянь+Adv:ичӧтвывсянь ADV_IS_EGR  "" ;
казьтылігӧн+Adv:казьтылігӧн ADV_IS_GER_IGON  "" ;
келігӧн+Adv:келігӧн ADV_IS_GER_IGON  "" ;
кералігӧн+Adv:кералігӧн ADV_IS_GER_IGON  "" ;
кикутігӧн+Adv:кикутігӧн ADV_IS_GER_IGON  "" ;
китӧг-подтӧг+Adv:китӧг-подтӧг ADV_IS_N_TOG  "" ;
коймӧдысь+Adv:коймӧдысь ADV_ITER_  "kolmannen kerran" ;
колльӧдігӧн+Adv:колльӧдігӧн ADV_IS_GER_IGON  "" ;
кор+Adv:кор ADV_REL_TEMP_  "kun" ;
кор-нибудь+Adv:кор-нибудь ADV_INDEF_  "" ;
корджык+Adv:корджык ADV_REL_TEMP_  "(tarkemmin) milloin" ;
кор-некор+Adv:кор-некор AdvTemp  "" ;
коркӧ+Adv:коркӧ ADV_TEMP_  "kerran" ;
кук+Adv:кук ADV_DEG_  "" ;
кызвынлалань+Adv:кызвынлалань ADV_IS_APR  "" ;
кызвынлаланьӧ+Adv:кызвынлаланьӧ ADV_IS_APRILL  "" ;
кызвынлаланьысь+Adv:кызвынлаланьысь ADV_IS_APRELA  "" ;
кызвынлаланьын+Adv:кызвынлаланьын ADV_IS_APRINE  "" ;
кызмырдысьӧн+Adv:кызмырдысьӧн ADV_IS_INS  "" ;
кызсьыв+Adv:кызсьы^л2 ADV_L  "" ;
кык% пӧв+Adv:кык% пӧв ADV_MULT_  "kahteen kertaan" ;
кыкысь-куимысь+Adv:кыкысь-куимысь CARD_ITER_APPR  "" ;
кӧритӧмпырысь+Adv:кӧритӧмпырысь ADV_  "" ;
луна+Adv:луна AdvTemp  "" ;
матіникын+Adv:матіникын ADV_IS_INE  "" ;
матӧ+Adv:матӧ ADV_IS_ILL  "lähes" ;
мукӧдлаланьын+Adv:мукӧдлаланьын ADV_IS_APRINE  "" ;
мукӧдлаӧд+Adv:мукӧдлаӧд ADV_IS_PRL  "" ;
мышладорті+Adv:мышладорті ADV_IS_TRA  "" ;
мӧдарланьӧ+Adv:мӧдарланьӧ ADV_IS_APRILL  "" ;
мӧдарсянь+Adv:мӧдарсянь ADV_IS_EGR  "" ;
мӧдлаысь+Adv:мӧдлаысь ADV_IS_ELA  "" ;
мӧдлаланьысь+Adv:мӧдлаланьысь ADV_IS_APRELA  "" ;
мӧдысь+Adv:мӧдысь ADV_ITER_  "toiste" ;
мӧдысь-коймӧдысь+Adv:мӧдысь-коймӧдысь ORD_ITER_APPR  "" ;
нагавоч+Adv:нагавоч ADV_DEG_  "" ;
наизусьт+Adv:наизусть ADV_SUB  "ulkoa" ;
некор+Adv:некор ADV_NEG_  "ei koskaan" ;
некыдз+Adv:некыдз ADV_NEG_  "" ;
некӧні+v1+Adv:некӧні ADV_NEG_  "ei missään" ;
некӧні+v2+Adv:некӧн ADV_NEG_  "ei missään" ;
ортсылань+Adv:ортсылань ADV_IS_APR  "" ;
ортсӧ+Adv:ортсӧ ADV_IS_ILL  "" ;
первӧй+Adv:первӧй ADV_  "ensin" ;
подӧн+Adv:подӧн ADV_IS_INS  "jalan" ;
помтӧг+Adv:помтӧг ADV_IS_N_TOG  "" ;
пытшкӧсын+Adv:пытшкӧсын ADV_IS_INE  "" ;
рытгорув+Adv:рытгору^л2 ADV_L  "" ;
рытсёрӧдз+Adv:рытсёрӧдз ADV_IS_TER  "" ;
садьтӧг+Adv:садьтӧг ADV_IS_N_TOG  "" ;
сайын+Adv:сай ADV_SPAT_INE  "" ;
сейчас+Adv:сейчас ADV_F  "" ;
серамбанӧн+Adv:серамбанӧн ADV_STATE  "" ;
судтӧг-радтӧг+Adv:судтӧг-радтӧг ADV_IS_N_TOG  "" ;
сыладорсянь+Adv:сыладорсянь ADV_IS_EGR  "" ;
сэки+v1+Adv:сэки ADV_TEMP_  "silloin" ;
сэнъясын+Adv:сэнъяс ADV_SPAT  "niissä paikoissa" ;
сэні+v1+Adv:сэні ADV_IS_INE_  "tuolla" ;
сэні+v2+Adv:сэн ADV_IS_INE_AND_COP_PL_  "tuolla" ;
сэтчӧ+v6+Adv+Err/Dial:сэче ADV_IS_ILL  "sinne" ;
сэті+Adv:сэті ADV_IS_TRA  "sitä kautta" ;
сё+Adv:сё ADV_DEG_  "" ;
сёрӧник+Adv:сёрӧник ADV_TEMP_  "" ;
этадзи+v1+Adv:этадзи ADV_MANNER_  "" ;
этадзи+v2+Adv:этадз ADV_MANNER_  "" ;
сідзи+v1+Adv:сідзи ADV_MANNER_  "näin" ;
сідзи+v2+Adv:сідз ADV_MANNER_  "" ;
сӧстӧмӧдз+Adv:сӧстӧмӧдз ADV_IS_TER  "" ;
тадзи+v1+Adv:тадзи ADV_MANNER_  "niin, näin" ;
тадзи+v2+Adv:тадз ADV_MANNER_  "niin" ;
тадзинад+v1+Adv:тадзинад ADV_PARENTHETIC_  "" ;
тадзинад+v2+Adv:тадзнад ADV_PARENTHETIC_  "" ;
талун-аски+Adv:талун-аски ADV_TEMP_  "" ;
тані+v1+Adv:тані ADV_IS_INE_  "" ;
тані+v2+Adv:тан ADV_IS_INE_AND_COP_PL_  "täällä" ;
татысь+Adv:татысь ADV_IS_ELA  "täältä" ;
торйӧдчигӧн+Adv:торйӧдчигӧн ADV_IS_GER_IGON  "" ;
торйӧн+Adv:торйӧн ADV_  "" ;
туйтӧг+Adv:туйтӧг ADV_IS_N_TOG  "" ;
увлань+Adv:увлань ADV_IS_APR  "" ;
уналаланьӧ+Adv:уналаланьӧ ADV_IS_APRILL  "" ;
уналаланьын+Adv:уналаланьын ADV_IS_APRINE  "" ;
уналаӧд+Adv:уналаӧд ADV_IS_PRL  "" ;
унаысь+Adv:унаысь ADV_ITER_  "monesti" ;
унджыклаысь+Adv:унджыклаысь ADV_IS_ELA  "" ;
унджыклаланьысь+Adv:унджыклаланьысь ADV_IS_APRELA  "" ;
чистӧ+Adv:чистӧ ADV_DEG_  "" ;
шуйгалань+Adv:шуйгалань ADV_IS_APR  "" ;
шӧрвыйын+Adv:шӧрвыйын ADV_IS_INE  "" ;
ылӧдз+Adv:ылӧдз ADV_IS_TER  "" ;
ылӧд+Adv:ылӧд ADV_IS_PRL  "" ;
ылісянь+Adv:ылісянь ADV_IS_EGR  "" ;
ыліті+Adv:ыліті ADV_IS_TRA  "" ;
эсся+Adv:эсся ADV_  "vielä" ;
этшаысь+Adv:этшаысьысь ADV_IS_ELA  "" ;
югдытӧдз+Adv:югдытӧдз ADV_IS_GER_TODZ  "" ;
юртӧг-садьтӧг+Adv:юртӧг-садьтӧг ADV_IS_N_TOG  "" ;
явнӧ+Adv:явн ADV_O2  "" ;
явӧ+Adv:яв ADV_O2  "ilmeisesti" ;
ӧбиднӧ+Adv:ӧбидн ADV_O2  "" ;
ӧдйӧ+Adv:ӧдй ADV_O2  "nopeasti" ;
ӧти-кӧ+Adv:ӧти-к ADV_O2  "" ;
ӧти-мӧдлаланьӧ+Adv:ӧти-мӧдлаланьӧ ADV_IS_APRILL  "" ;
ӧти-мӧдлаланьын+Adv:ӧти-мӧдлаланьын ADV_IS_APRINE  "" ;
ӧтиклаӧ+Adv:ӧтиклаӧ ADV_IS_ILL  "" ;
ӧтиклалань+Adv:ӧтиклалань ADV_IS_APR  "" ;
ӧтиклаланьысь+Adv:ӧтиклаланьысь ADV_IS_APRELA  "" ;
ӧтитӧг+Adv:ӧтитӧг ADV_IS_Q_TOG  "" ;
ӧткымынлаӧд+Adv:ӧткымынлаӧд ADV_IS_PRL  "" ;
ӧтпырйӧ+Adv:ӧтпырй ADV_O2  "kerrallaan" ;
ӧтчыдысь+Adv:ӧтчыдысь ADV_ITER_  "kerran" ;
